California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) Subsection (b) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986” with “For purposes
 of this part.”

(g) Notwithstanding Section 17280, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, Section 304(a) of Title III of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided. 

(h) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Covered loan” has the same meaning as in Section 1106 of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136), or pursuant to the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(2) “Advance grant amount” means an emergency Economic Injury Disaster Loan grant pursuant to Section 1110(e) of the Coronavirus
 Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136), or a targeted Economic Injury Disaster Loan advance pursuant to Section 331 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(3) “Ineligible entity” means a taxpayer that either:

(A) Is a publicly traded company.

(B) Does not meet the reduction from the gross receipts requirements of Section 636(a)(37)(A)(iv)(bb) of Title 15 of the United States Code, as added by Section 311 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(4) “Publicly traded company” means a publicly traded entity as described in Section 342 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations
 Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(i) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(j) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019.

(k) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 55 of the Statutes of 2022 shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 17.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Operative in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, by Stats. 2022, Ch. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.9.

Gross income does not include any supplementary payment received by an individual pursuant to Section 12306.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 8.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Note: See Sec. 32 of Ch. 725.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.10.

Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of this part, the natural gas transmission line explosion on September 9, 2010, in San Bruno, California, shall be treated as a qualified disaster within the meaning of Section 139 of the Internal Revenue Code. This section shall apply to payments made on or after September 9, 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 18, Sec. 1.   (AB 50)   Effective April 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.11.

Section 4 of the Federal Disaster Tax Relief Act of 2023 (Public Law 118-148), relating to East Palestine disaster relief payments, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 18.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.12.

(a) Gross income does not include any payments received by an individual from a guaranteed income pilot program or project that receives a grant pursuant to Section 18997 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 12.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.13.

Gross income does not include any payment received by an individual pursuant to Section 8257 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 40, Sec. 21.   (AB 129)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.14.

Gross income does not include any payment received from the California Victim Compensation Board pursuant to Sections 13955 and 13970 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 119, Sec. 1.   (AB 2979)   Effective July 15, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.15.

(a) Gross income does not include any payments received by an individual pursuant to Section 8161 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 17131.12 (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 51, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 209.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.16.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2026, gross income does not include a bill credit or credits received by a customer from a community water system or wastewater treatment provider pursuant to the Water and Wastewater System Payments Under the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Chapter 4.7 (commencing with Section 116773) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code). 

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 9.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.17.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2026, gross income does not include a bill credit or credits received by a customer from a utility applicant under the California Arrearage Payment Program (CAPP), pursuant to the California Arrearage Payment Program Under the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Article 12 (commencing with Section 16429.5) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 10.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.18.

Gross income does not include any payment received by an individual pursuant to Section 15990 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 266, Sec. 5.   (AB 1878)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.20.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, gross income does not include a bill credit or credits received by a customer from a utility applicant under the 2022 California Arrearage Payment Program, pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 16429.8) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 12.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.21.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, gross income does not include any amount relating to the discharge of any unpaid fees due or owed by a student to a community college which was discharged pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 32527 of the Education Code.

(b) (1) For the purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of the exclusion allowed by this section is to provide financial relief to community college students affected by the adverse impacts of the economic disruptions and hardships resulting from the COVID-19 emergency.

(2) The performance indicators used to determine whether the exclusion is achieving its stated purpose are the number of students that had fees discharged pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 32527 of the Education Code, and the total dollar value of those fees discharged.

(3) The report required to be submitted by the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges to the Legislature, as required by paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 32527 of the Education Code, shall constitute reporting for the purpose of complying with Section 41.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   (AB 111)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.22.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2028, gross income does not include amounts of certain emergency financial aid grants received by a student in postsecondary education pursuant to, or described in, any of the following:

(1) Section 3504 or 18004 of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (CARES Act) (Public Law 116-136).

(2) Section 314 of Division M or Section 277 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(3) Section 2003 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2).

(b) (1) For purposes of complying with Section 41, as it pertains to this section, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(A) The specific goal, purpose, and objective of the exclusion is to provide financial relief to recipients of specified pandemic relief funds.

(B) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining if the exclusion has achieved this goal shall be the number of taxpayers excluding specified pandemic relief from income based on this section, and the total dollar value of income so excluded.

(2) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall, no later than November 1, 2028, submit a report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that estimates the number of
 taxpayers with specified pandemic relief excluded from income, and estimates the total dollar value of the specified pandemic relief received, to the extent data is available.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   (AB 111)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17132.1.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, a nonresident alien’s gross income does not include any payment made by an agent pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 18537.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 73, Sec. 1.   (AB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17132.3.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, gross income does not include any payment made pursuant to Section 6417 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169, relating to elective payment of applicable credits. Sections 6417(c)(1)(C) and 6417(c)(1)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169, shall apply.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
 2026, and before January 1, 2031, gross income does not include any payment made pursuant to Section 6418 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169, relating to transfer of certain credits.

(1) Sections 6418(c)(1)(A) and 6418(c)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169, shall apply.

(2) No deduction shall be allowed for any amount paid in consideration of a transfer made as described in Section 6418 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169.

(c) For purposes of this section, “payment made pursuant to Section 6418 of the Internal Revenue Code” includes the value of a credit received by a transferee pursuant to Section
 6418 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169.

(d) (1) For purposes of complying with Section 41, for this section and Section 24310.5, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The goal, purpose, and objective of the conformity to the exclusion and deduction provisions of Sections 6417 and 6418 of the Internal Revenue Code is to promote the investment and construction of clean energy projects and clean energy advanced manufacturing facilities in California.

(B) The performance indicators to measure whether the conformity meets the goal, purpose, and objective stated in
 subparagraph (A) are data from taxpayers utilizing credits under Sections 6417 and 6418 of the Internal Revenue Code filing in California.

(2) To assist the Legislature in determining whether the conformity fulfills the goal, purpose, and objective stated in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), the Franchise Tax Board shall report to the Legislature regarding the data described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) on or before November 1, 2029, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 215, Sec. 2.   (SB 302)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17132.4.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, gross income does not include the death benefits received by an eligible individual.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Death benefit” means the entire amount of the death benefit payment made pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 850) of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(2) “Eligible individual” means the surviving spouse of, or a beneficiary designated by, any member of the California National Guard,
 State Guard, or Naval Militia who dies or is killed in the performance of duty, as provided in Section 850 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 46.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17132.5.

Section 101 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain death benefits, is modified as follows:

(a) Section 101(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to survivor benefits attributable to service by a public safety officer who is killed in the line of duty, is modified to apply to amounts received in taxable years beginning after December 31, 1996,
 with respect to individuals dying after December 31, 1996.

(b) (1) Section 101 of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by subdivision (a) is modified to additionally provide that Section 101(h) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to survivor benefits attributable to service by a public safety officer who is killed in the line of duty with respect to deaths occurring before December 31, 1996, that would otherwise be eligible for exclusion pursuant to Section 101(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by Public Law 107-15.

(2) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 691 of the Statutes of 2005 shall apply to amounts paid after December 31, 2001, with respect to deaths occurring on or before December 31, 1996.

(c) (1) Section 101 of the Internal Revenue
 Code, as modified by subdivision (b), is modified to additionally provide that Section 101(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to any astronaut whose death occurs in the line of duty.

(2) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 552 of the Statutes of 2004 shall apply to amounts received in taxable years beginning after December 31, 2002, with respect to deaths occurring after that date.

(d) Section 101(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the treatment of certain employer-owned life insurance contracts, shall apply in accordance with the provisions of Section 863 of the Pension Protection Act of 2006 (Public Law 109-280), relating to effective dates, except that the phrase “January 1, 2010,” shall be substituted for “the date of the enactment of this Act” contained therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 12.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17132.7.

A payment under Section 103(c)(10) of the Ricky Ray Hemophilia Relief Fund Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-369) to an individual shall be treated for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) as damages described in Section 104(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 17132.6 (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 807, Sec. 4.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17132.8.

(a) For purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), gross income shall not include any amount received from the Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, out of amounts transferred from the Hokie Spirit Memorial Fund established by the Virginia Tech Foundation, an organization organized and operated as described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, if that amount is
 paid on account of the events on April 16, 2007, at that university.

(b) This section shall apply without regard to taxable year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 13.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17132.9.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2030, gross income shall not include retirement pay received by a qualified taxpayer during the taxable year, not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), from the federal government for service in the uniformed services.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that satisfies either of the following:

(A) In the case of a surviving spouse or spouses filing a joint return, adjusted gross income, as required to be shown on the federal tax return for the same
 taxable year, does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(B) In the case of any other individual, adjusted gross income, as required to be shown on the federal tax return for the same taxable year, does not exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000).

(2) “Uniformed services” means the Armed Forces of the United States, the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard when engaged in active duty for training, inactive duty training, or full-time National Guard duty, the commissioned corps of the United States Public Health Service, and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Commissioned Officer Corps.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 12.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17132.10.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2030, gross income shall not include annuity payments received by a qualified taxpayer during the taxable year, not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), pursuant to a United States Department of Defense Survivor Benefit Plan.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Qualified taxpayer” means the surviving spouse or other named beneficiary of a plan who satisfies either of the following:

(A) In the case of a surviving spouse or spouses filing a joint return, adjusted gross income, as required
 to be shown on the federal tax return for the same taxable year, does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(B) In the case of any other individual, adjusted gross income, as required to be shown on the federal tax return for the same taxable year, does not exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000).

(2) “United States Department of Defense Survivor Benefit Plan” or “plan” means a survivor benefit plan established pursuant to Sections 1447 to 1455, inclusive, of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 13.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17132.11.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, gross income shall not include any loan amount repaid by the United States Secretary of Education or canceled pursuant to Section 1098e of Title 20 of the United States Code relating to income-based repayment.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January
 1, 2022, gross income shall not include any loan amount repaid by the United States Secretary of Education or canceled pursuant to Section 1087e(e) of Title 20 of the United States Code relating to income-contingent repayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 193.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17133.

Income which this state is prohibited from taxing includes interest on bonds issued by this state or a local government in this state, and the determination of whether a bond is issued by this state or a local government in this state shall be made without regard to (a) the source of payment of that bond or the security for that bond, public or private, and (b) whether or not public improvements are financed. If there is at any time following the original issuance of such a bond a separation in ownership between the bond and any right to receive interest on the bond (whether or not evidenced by a coupon), payments or
 accruals on that stripped bond and stripped coupon shall be treated in a manner consistent with Section 1286(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1352, Sec. 26.   Effective October 2, 1989.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, by Sec. 172 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

17133.5.

The following phrase (or its substantial equivalent) in other codes or statutes does not exempt the gain or loss from the sale or transfer of bonds from the provisions of this part:

“The issuance, transfer and interest income earned on any bonds issued by an agency (state or local) under this article (chapter, section, etc.) is exempt from taxation of every kind by any state or local entity.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective July 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

17134.

Any loan made pursuant to the Forgivable Loan Program of the California State University shall be deemed to be a student loan within the meaning of Section 108(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, and Section 108(f)(1) shall apply to any discharge of the loan that is made in connection with the borrower’s performance of services for the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.   Effective August 5, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17135.

The use of an automobile by a special agent of federal or state taxing agencies shall be treated in the manner provided for by Section 1567 of Public Law 99-514.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1138, Sec. 56.   Effective September 25, 1987.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, by Sec. 189 of Ch. 1138.)
-------------------------------------------

17135.5.

(a) Gross income does not include cost-share payments received by forest landowners from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to the California Forest Improvement Act of 1978 (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 4790) of Division 1 of the Public Resources Code) or from the United States Department of Agriculture, Forest Service, under the Forest Stewardship Program and the Stewardship Incentives Program, pursuant to the Cooperative Forestry Assistance Act, as amended (Public Law 101-624).

(b) The amount of any cost-share payment excluded pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered with regard to either of the following:

(1) Determining the basis of property acquired or improved.

(2) Computing any allowable deduction to which the taxpayer may otherwise be entitled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

17136.

Section 1078 of Public Law 98-369 (Tax Reform Act of 1984), relating to exclusions from gross income of payments from the United States Forest Service as a result of restricting motorized traffic in the Boundary Waters Canoe Area, shall apply, with the following exceptions:

(a) Section 1078(f)(2) of that act shall not be applicable.

(b) This section shall be effective only for payments made in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1985.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1461, Sec. 14.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17138.

Any amount received as a rebate or voucher from a local water or energy agency or supplier for any expenses the taxpayer paid or incurred for the purchase or installation of any of the following devices shall be treated as a refund or price adjustment of amounts payable to that water or energy agency or supplier:

(a) A water conservation water closet that meets the performance standards of American National Standards Institute Standard A112.19.2 and uses no more than 1.6 gallons per flush, or
 for the installation of a urinal that meets the performance standards of American National Standards Institute Standard A112.19.2 and uses no more than one gallon per flush.

(b) A water and energy efficient clothes washer that meets a 1.04 modified energy factor and 9.5 water use efficiency factor as determined by the State Energy Resources and Conservation Commission.

(c) A plumbing device necessary to serve the recycled water uses described in Sections 13553 and 13554 of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   Effective August 31, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17138.1.

Gross income does not include any amount received as a rebate, voucher, or other financial incentive issued by the California Energy Commission, the Public Utility Commission, or a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 9604 of the Public Utilities Code, for any expenses paid or incurred by a taxpayer for the purchase or installation of any of the following devices:

(a) A thermal system as defined in Section 25600 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) A solar system as defined in Section 25600 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) A wind energy system device that produces electricity.

(d) A fuel cell generating system, as described in the California Energy Commission’s Emerging Renewable Resources Account Guidebook, that produces electricity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 843, Sec. 1.   Effective September 24, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17138.2.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, gross income does not include any amount received as a rebate, voucher, or other financial incentive issued by a public water system, local government, or state agency for participation in a turf replacement water conservation program.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “public water system” shall
 have the same meaning as in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 674, Sec. 1.   (AB 2142)   Effective September 28, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17138.3.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after July 1, 2015, gross income does not include an amount received as a loan forgiveness, grant, credit, rebate, voucher, or other financial incentive issued by the California Residential Mitigation Program or the California Earthquake Authority to assist a residential property owner or occupant with expenses paid, or obligations incurred, for earthquake
 loss mitigation.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “earthquake loss mitigation” means an activity that reduces seismic risks to a residential structure or its contents, or both. For purposes of structural seismic risk mitigation, a residential structure is either of the following:

(1) A structure described in subdivision (a) of Section 10087 of the Insurance Code.

(2) A residential building of not fewer than 2, but not more than 10, dwelling units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 323, Sec. 10.   (SB 102)   Effective September 22, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17138.4.

(a) Gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) The term “qualified amount” includes any of the following:

(A) Amounts received by a qualified taxpayer during the remediation of the Carousel Housing Tract,
 located in Carson, California, from the Shell Oil Company for costs associated with temporary accommodations and relocation pursuant to California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046. These costs include all amounts paid under the Temporary Living Assistance section of the Revised Remedial Action Plan, Relocation Plan, developed by URS Corporation for Shell Oil Products U.S., dated September 19, 2014.

(B) Amounts received by a qualified taxpayer paid under the Optional Real Estate Program of the Revised Remedial Action Plan, Relocation Plan, developed by URS Corporation for Shell Oil Products U.S., dated September 19, 2014.

(C) Any amounts received by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement arising out of the investigation, cleanup, or abatement of the waste discharged at the former Kast Property Tank Farm facility pursuant to California
 Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046.

(2) The term “qualified amount” does not include any reimbursed amounts representing any expenses related to California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046 that were deducted under this part.

(c) For purposes of this section, “qualified taxpayer” means either of the following:

(1) Any taxpayer that currently owns or previously owned real property located within the Carousel Housing Tract, located in Carson, California, who received amounts, incurred expenses, or received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046.

(2) Any taxpayer that
 currently resides or previously resided within the Carousel Housing Tract, located in Carson, California, who received amounts, incurred expenses, or received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046.

(d) The payor under the Revised Remedial Action Plan, Relocation Plan, developed by URS Corporation for Shell Oil Products U.S., dated September 19, 2014, and the payor or payors of the settlement proceeds arising out of or pursuant to California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046, shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, an annual list of names, addresses, payment dates, and amounts paid to qualified taxpayers.

(e) (1) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning before, on, or after the effective
 date of the act adding this section.

(2) If the credit or refund of any overpayment of tax resulting from the application of this section to a period before the effective date of this section is prevented as of such date by the operation of any law or rule of law, including res judicata, such credit or refund may nevertheless be allowed or made if the claim therefor is filed before the close of the one-year period beginning on the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 887, Sec. 2.   (SB 343)   Effective September 28, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17138.5.

(a) Gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from the Fire Victims Trust, established pursuant to the order of the United States Bankruptcy Court for the Northern District of California dated June 20, 2020, case number 19-30088, docket number 8053.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:

(A) (i) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Amador or Calaveras during the 2015 Butte Fire who incurred and paid expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2015 Butte Fire.

(ii) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Amador or
 Calaveras during the 2015 Butte Fire who incurred and paid expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2015 Butte Fire.

(B) (i) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Napa, Sonoma, Lake, Butte, Mendocino, or Solano during the 2017 North Bay Fires who incurred and paid expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to one or more of the 2017 North Bay Fires.

(ii) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Napa, Sonoma, Lake, Butte, Mendocino, or Solano during the 2017 North Bay Fires who incurred and paid expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to one or more of the 2017 North Bay Fires.

(C) (i) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Butte during the 2018 Camp Fire who incurred and paid expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2018 Camp Fire.

(ii) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Butte during the 2018 Camp Fire who incurred and paid expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2018 Camp Fire.

(c) The Fire Victims Trust, shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, an annual list of names, addresses, payment dates, and qualified amounts paid to qualified taxpayers.

(d) (1) This
 section shall apply to taxable years beginning before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(2) If the credit or refund of any overpayment of tax resulting from the application of this section to a period before the effective date of this section is prevented as of that date by the operation of any law or rule of law, including res judicata, that credit or refund may nevertheless be allowed or made if the claim therefor is filed before the close of the one-year period beginning on the effective date of the act adding this section.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 749, Sec. 2.   (AB 1249)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17138.6.

(a) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2027, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from Southern California Edison in settlement for claims relating to the 2017 Thomas Fire or the 2018 Woolsey Fire.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:

(A) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Ventura or Santa Barbara during the 2017 Thomas Fire who paid and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2017 Thomas Fire.

(B) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Ventura or Santa Barbara during the 2017 Thomas Fire who paid and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2017 Thomas Fire.

(C) Any taxpayer that
 had
 a place of business within the County of Ventura or Santa Barbara during the 2017 Thomas Fire who paid and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2017 Thomas Fire.

(D) Any taxpayer that owned real
 property located in the County of Ventura or Los Angeles during the 2018 Woolsey Fire who paid and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2018 Woolsey Fire.

(E) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Ventura or Los Angeles during the 2018 Woolsey Fire who paid
 and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2018 Woolsey Fire.

(F) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Ventura or Los Angeles during the 2018 Woolsey Fire who paid
 and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2018 Woolsey Fire.

(3) “Settlement entity” means the entity making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer as described in paragraph (2).

(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement
 payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) (1) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(2) If the credit or refund of any overpayment of tax resulting from the application of this section to a period before the effective date of this section is prevented as of that date by the operation of any law or rule of law, including res judicata, that credit or refund may nevertheless be allowed or made if the claim therefor is filed before the close of the one-year period beginning on the effective date of the act adding this section.

(e) This section
 shall remain in effect only until December 1,
 2027,
 and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   (SB 1246)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17138.7.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2030, gross income shall not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer in the taxable year.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received from a settlement entity by a qualified taxpayer in connection with a qualified wildfire disaster in California.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:

(A) Any taxpayer who owns real property located in an area damaged by a